src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-keessid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../..//generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - peehiđ: # ML checked

    peehiđ+V+Inf: peehiđ
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: pehhuđ # checked with Matti's and Petter
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pehhuum
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pehhuuh
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piähhoo
#    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: piähhojeen
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pehhuuvettee
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: pehhuv
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pehhup
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pehhuuvetteđ
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: piähhojeh
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: piähhojim
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: piähhojih
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pehhui
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: pehhuim
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: pehhuid
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: pehhuin
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pehhuim
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pehhuid
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: piähhojii
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: pehhuuččim
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: pehhuuččih
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: pehhuuččij
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: pehhuuččáim
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: pehhuuččáid
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: pehhuuččáin
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: pehhuuččijm
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: pehhuuččijd
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: pehhuuččii
#    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: pehhuužeem
#    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: pehhuužeeh
##    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: pehhuš
#    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: pehhuužeen
#    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: pehhušvettee
#    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: pehhuužává
#    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: pehhuužep
#    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: pehhušvetteđ
#    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: pehhuužeh
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: pehhuu
#    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: pehhum
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: pehhuuččii
#    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: pehhuužii
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: [piähhojeijee, piähhojijjee]
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: pehhum
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: pehhum
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: pehhuumin
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: pehhuumist
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: pehhuumân
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: pehhuudijn
    peehiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: pehhuuhánnáá
    peehiđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pevistâm
    peehiđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pevittâm
    peehiđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: peviškuáđám
